test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-huedsi21_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hüdsi: # Noun (21) hüdsi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Nom: hüdsi
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Gen: hüdse
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Par: hüst
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Ill: [hütsi, hüste]
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Ine: [hüdsen, hüdseh, hüdsehn]
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Ela: hüdsest
     hüdsi+N+Sg+All: hüdsele
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Ade: hüdsel
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Abl: hüdselt
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Tra: hüdses
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Ter: hüdseniq
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Abe: hüdseldäq
     hüdsi+N+Sg+Com: hüdsegaq
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Nom: hüdseq
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Gen: [hütsi, hüste]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Par: hütsi
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Ill: [hütsihe, hütsi, hütside]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Ine: [hüdsin, hüdsih, hüdsihn, hütsin, hütsih,  hütsihn]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Ela: [hüdsist, hütsist]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+All: [hüdsile, hütsile]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Ade: [hüdsil, hütsil]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Abl: [hüdsilt, hütsilt]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Tra: [hüdsis, hütsis]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Ter: [hüdsiniq, hütsiniq]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Abe: [hüdsildäq, hütsildäq]
     hüdsi+N+Pl+Com: hütsigaq
